Utah statutes.
48-2a-201 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Certificate of limited partnerships.

(1)  In order to form a limited partnership a certificate of limited partnership must be executed and filed with the division, setting forth:

(a)  the name of the limited partnership;

(b)  the information required by Subsection 16-17-203(1);

(c)  the name and business address of each general partner;

(d) (i)  the latest date upon which the limited partnership is to dissolve, if the duration of the limited partnership is to be limited; or

(ii)  a statement to the effect that the limited partnership is to have perpetual duration; and

(e)  any other matters the general partners determine to include.

(2)  A limited partnership is formed:

(a)  at the time of the filing of the certificate of limited partnership with the division as evidenced by the stamped copy returned by the division pursuant to Subsection 48-2a-206(1); or

(b)  at any later time specified in the certificate of limited partnership.

